Washington statutes.
RCW 18.71.050

Application—Eligibility requirements—United States and Canadian graduates.

(1) Each applicant who has graduated from a school of medicine located in any state, territory, or possession of the United States, the District of Columbia, or the Dominion of Canada, shall file an application for licensure with the commission on a form prepared by the secretary with the approval of the commission. Each applicant shall furnish proof satisfactory to the commission of the following:

(a) That the applicant has attended and graduated from a school of medicine approved by the commission;

(b) That the applicant has completed two years of postgraduate medical training in a program acceptable to the commission, provided that applicants graduating before July 28, 1985, may complete only one year of postgraduate medical training;

(c) That the applicant is of good moral character; and

(d) That the applicant is physically and mentally capable of safely carrying on the practice of medicine. The commission may require any applicant to submit to such examination or examinations as it deems necessary to determine an applicant's physical and/or mental capability to safely practice medicine.

(2) Nothing in this section shall be construed as prohibiting the commission from requiring such additional information from applicants as it deems necessary. The issuance and denial of licenses are subject to chapter 18.130 RCW, the Uniform Disciplinary Act.

[ 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 307; 1991 c 3 s 161. Prior: 1986 c 259 s 109; 1985 c 322 s 2; 1975 1st ex.s. c 171 s 7; 1961 c 284 s 5; 1957 c 60 s 3; prior: 1947 c 168 s 1, part; 1919 c 134 s 3, part; 1909 c 192 s 6, part; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 10008, part; prior: 1905 c 41 s 1, part; 1901 c 42 s 1, part; 1890 p 115 s 3, part; Code 1881 s 2285, part.]

NOTES:

Severability—Headings and captions not law—Effective date—1994 sp.s. c 9: See RCW 18.79.900 through 18.79.902.

Severability—1986 c 259: See note following RCW 18.130.010.